Illinois, session 104th, HB1360.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Employees Group Insurance Act of 1971 5is amended by changing Section 6.11 and by renumbering and 6changing 6.11D as added by Public Act 103-975 as follows: 7    (5 ILCS 375/6.11)8    Sec. 6.11. Required health benefits; Illinois Insurance 9Code requirements. The program of health benefits shall 10provide the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 11covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 12Section 356t of the Illinois Insurance Code. The program of 13health benefits shall provide the coverage required under 14Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 15356w, 356x, 356z.2, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 16356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 17356z.17, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 18356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 19356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 20356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 21356z.70, and 356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.76, 356z.77, and 356z.80 22of the Illinois Insurance Code. The program of health benefits 23must comply with Sections 155.22a, 155.37, 355b, 356z.19,   HB1360 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 07412 BAB 17453 b1370c, and 370c.1 and Article XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance 2Code. The program of health benefits shall provide the 3coverage required under Section 356m of the Illinois Insurance 4Code and, for the employees of the State Employee Group 5Insurance Program only, the coverage as also provided in 6Section 6.11B of this Act. The Department of Insurance shall 7enforce the requirements of this Section with respect to 8Sections 370c and 370c.1 of the Illinois Insurance Code; all 9other requirements of this Section shall be enforced by the 10Department of Central Management Services.11    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 12any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 13with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 14Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 15Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 16whatever reason, is unauthorized. 17(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 18102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 191-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-768, 20eff. 1-1-24; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 21102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 221-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-8, eff. 1-1-24; 103-84, 23eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 24103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 258-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 26eff. 8-2-24; 103-870, eff. 1-1-25; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25;   HB1360 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 07412 BAB 17453 b1103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-951, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 21-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 3    (5 ILCS 375/6.11E)4    Sec. 6.11E 6.11D. Coverage for treatments to slow the 5progression of Alzheimer's disease and related dementias. 6Beginning on July 1, 2025, the State Employees Group Insurance 7Program shall provide coverage for all medically necessary 8FDA-approved treatments or medications prescribed to slow the 9progression of Alzheimer's disease or another related 10dementia, as determined by a physician licensed to practice 11medicine in all its branches. Coverage for all FDA-approved 12treatments or medications prescribed to slow the progression 13of Alzheimer's disease or another related dementia shall not 14be subject to step therapy. Any diagnostic testing necessary 15for a physician to determine appropriate use of these 16treatments or medications shall be covered by the State 17Employees Group Insurance Program. This Section is repealed on 18July 1, 2027. 19(Source: P.A. 103-975, eff. 1-1-25; revised 12-1-24.) 20    Section 10. The Counties Code is amended by changing 21Section 5-1069.3 as follows: 22    (55 ILCS 5/5-1069.3)23    Sec. 5-1069.3. Required health benefits. If a county,   HB1360 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 07412 BAB 17453 b1including a home rule county, is a self-insurer for purposes 2of providing health insurance coverage for its employees, the 3coverage shall include coverage for the post-mastectomy care 4benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 5health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 6under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 7356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 8356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 9356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 10356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 11356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 12356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 356z.70, and 356z.71, 13356z.74, 356z.77, and 356z.80 of the Illinois Insurance Code. 14The coverage shall comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 15356z.19, and 370c of the Illinois Insurance Code. The 16Department of Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this 17Section. The requirement that health benefits be covered as 18provided in this Section is an exclusive power and function of 19the State and is a denial and limitation under Article VII, 20Section 6, subsection (h) of the Illinois Constitution. A home 21rule county to which this Section applies must comply with 22every provision of this Section. 23    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 24any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 25with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 26Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on   HB1360 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 07412 BAB 17453 b1Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 2whatever reason, is unauthorized. 3(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 4102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 51-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, 6eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 7102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 81-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 9eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 10103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 117-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, 12eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 13revised 11-26-24.) 14    Section 15. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 15changing Section 10-4-2.3 as follows: 16    (65 ILCS 5/10-4-2.3)17    Sec. 10-4-2.3. Required health benefits. If a 18municipality, including a home rule municipality, is a 19self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance 20coverage for its employees, the coverage shall include 21coverage for the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 22covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 23Section 356t and the coverage required under Sections 356g, 24356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x,   HB1360 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 07412 BAB 17453 b1356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 2356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 3356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 4356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 5356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 6356z.67, 356z.68, and 356z.70, and 356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.77, 7and 356z.80 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The coverage shall 8comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 356z.19, and 370c of the 9Illinois Insurance Code. The Department of Insurance shall 10enforce the requirements of this Section. The requirement that 11health benefits be covered as provided in this is an exclusive 12power and function of the State and is a denial and limitation 13under Article VII, Section 6, subsection (h) of the Illinois 14Constitution. A home rule municipality to which this Section 15applies must comply with every provision of this Section. 16    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 17any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 18with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 19Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 20Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 21whatever reason, is unauthorized. 22(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 23102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 241-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, 25eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 26102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff.   HB1360 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 07412 BAB 17453 b11-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 2eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 3103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 47-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, 5eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 6revised 11-26-24.) 7    Section 20. The School Code is amended by changing Section 810-22.3f as follows: 9    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.3f)10    Sec. 10-22.3f. Required health benefits. Insurance 11protection and benefits for employees shall provide the 12post-mastectomy care benefits required to be covered by a 13policy of accident and health insurance under Section 356t and 14the coverage required under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 15356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 16356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 17356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 18356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 19356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 20356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 356z.70, and 21356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.77, and 356z.80 of the Illinois 22Insurance Code. Insurance policies shall comply with Section 23356z.19 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The coverage shall 24comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, and 370c of the Illinois   HB1360 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 07412 BAB 17453 b1Insurance Code. The Department of Insurance shall enforce the 2requirements of this Section. 3    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 4any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 5with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 6Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 7Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 8whatever reason, is unauthorized. 9(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 10102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 111-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, 12eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 13102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 141-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, 15eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 16103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, eff. 177-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, 18eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 19    Section 25. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 20adding Section 356z.80 as follows: 21    (215 ILCS 5/356z.80 new)22    Sec. 356z.80. Coverage for treatments to slow the 23progression of Alzheimer's disease and related dementias. 24    (a) A group or individual policy of accident and health   HB1360 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 07412 BAB 17453 b1insurance or a managed care plan that is amended, delivered, 2issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027 shall provide 3coverage for all medically necessary diagnostic testing and 4U.S. Food and Drug Administration-approved treatments or 5medications prescribed to slow the progression of Alzheimer's 6disease or another related dementia, in accordance with the 7U.S. Food and Drug Administration label, as determined by a 8physician licensed to practice medicine in all its branches. 9Coverage of U.S. Food and Drug Administration-approved 10treatments or medications prescribed to slow the progression 11of Alzheimer's disease or another related dementia pursuant to 12this Section shall not be subject to step therapy.13    (b) Nothing in this Section prohibits a group or 14individual policy of accident and health insurance or managed 15care plan, by contract, written policy, procedure, or any 16other agreement or course of conduct, from requiring a 17pharmacist to effect substitutions of prescription drugs 18consistent with Section 19.5 of the Pharmacy Practice Act, 19under which a pharmacist may substitute an interchangeable 20biologic for a prescribed biologic product, and Section 25 of 21the Pharmacy Practice Act, under which a pharmacist may select 22a generic drug determined to be therapeutically equivalent by 23the United States Food and Drug Administration and in 24accordance with the Illinois Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act. 25    (c) The coverage required under this Section shall not 26apply to managed care plans that are under contract with the   HB1360 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 07412 BAB 17453 b1Department of Healthcare and Family Services.  2    Section 30. The Health Maintenance Organization Act is 3amended by changing Section 5-3 as follows: 4    (215 ILCS 125/5-3)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1411.2)5    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-808)6    Sec. 5-3. Insurance Code provisions. 7    (a) Health Maintenance Organizations shall be subject to 8the provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 9141.1, 141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 10152, 153, 154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.22a, 11155.49, 352c, 355.2, 355.3, 355.6, 355b, 355c, 356f, 356g.5-1, 12356m, 356q, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356z.2, 356z.3a, 13356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 14356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.17, 356z.18, 15356z.19, 356z.20, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.23, 356z.24, 356z.25, 16356z.26, 356z.28, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.31, 356z.32, 356z.33, 17356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.36, 356z.37, 356z.38, 356z.39, 356z.40, 18356z.40a, 356z.41, 356z.44, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 19356z.48, 356z.49, 356z.50, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.55, 20356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.58, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 21356z.63, 356z.64, 356z.65, 356z.66, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.69, 22356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.77, 23356z.80, 364, 364.01, 364.3, 367.2, 367.2-5, 367i, 368a, 368b, 24368c, 368d, 368e, 370c, 370c.1, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A,   HB1360 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 07412 BAB 17453 b1408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1, paragraph (c) of 2subsection (2) of Section 367, and Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, 3XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and XXXIIB of the 4Illinois Insurance Code.5    (b) For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except 6for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 7Health Maintenance Organizations in the following categories 8are deemed to be "domestic companies":9        (1) a corporation authorized under the Dental Service 10    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act;11        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of this 12    State; or13        (3) a corporation organized under the laws of another 14    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 15    of this State, except a corporation subject to 16    substantially the same requirements in its state of 17    organization as is a "domestic company" under Article VIII 18    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.19    (c) In considering the merger, consolidation, or other 20acquisition of control of a Health Maintenance Organization 21pursuant to Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,22        (1) the Director shall give primary consideration to 23    the continuation of benefits to enrollees and the 24    financial conditions of the acquired Health Maintenance 25    Organization after the merger, consolidation, or other 26    acquisition of control takes effect;  HB1360 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 07412 BAB 17453 b1        (2)(i) the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b) of 2    Section 131.8 of the Illinois Insurance Code shall not 3    apply and (ii) the Director, in making his determination 4    with respect to the merger, consolidation, or other 5    acquisition of control, need not take into account the 6    effect on competition of the merger, consolidation, or 7    other acquisition of control;8        (3) the Director shall have the power to require the 9    following information:10            (A) certification by an independent actuary of the 11        adequacy of the reserves of the Health Maintenance 12        Organization sought to be acquired;13            (B) pro forma financial statements reflecting the 14        combined balance sheets of the acquiring company and 15        the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 16        acquired as of the end of the preceding year and as of 17        a date 90 days prior to the acquisition, as well as pro 18        forma financial statements reflecting projected 19        combined operation for a period of 2 years;20            (C) a pro forma business plan detailing an 21        acquiring party's plans with respect to the operation 22        of the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 23        acquired for a period of not less than 3 years; and24            (D) such other information as the Director shall 25        require.26    (d) The provisions of Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois   HB1360 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 07412 BAB 17453 b1Insurance Code and this Section 5-3 shall apply to the sale by 2any health maintenance organization of greater than 10% of its 3enrollee population (including, without limitation, the health 4maintenance organization's right, title, and interest in and 5to its health care certificates).6    (e) In considering any management contract or service 7agreement subject to Section 141.1 of the Illinois Insurance 8Code, the Director (i) shall, in addition to the criteria 9specified in Section 141.2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, 10take into account the effect of the management contract or 11service agreement on the continuation of benefits to enrollees 12and the financial condition of the health maintenance 13organization to be managed or serviced, and (ii) need not take 14into account the effect of the management contract or service 15agreement on competition.16    (f) Except for small employer groups as defined in the 17Small Employer Rating, Renewability and Portability Health 18Insurance Act and except for medicare supplement policies as 19defined in Section 363 of the Illinois Insurance Code, a 20Health Maintenance Organization may by contract agree with a 21group or other enrollment unit to effect refunds or charge 22additional premiums under the following terms and conditions:23        (i) the amount of, and other terms and conditions with 24    respect to, the refund or additional premium are set forth 25    in the group or enrollment unit contract agreed in advance 26    of the period for which a refund is to be paid or   HB1360 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 07412 BAB 17453 b1    additional premium is to be charged (which period shall 2    not be less than one year); and3        (ii) the amount of the refund or additional premium 4    shall not exceed 20% of the Health Maintenance 5    Organization's profitable or unprofitable experience with 6    respect to the group or other enrollment unit for the 7    period (and, for purposes of a refund or additional 8    premium, the profitable or unprofitable experience shall 9    be calculated taking into account a pro rata share of the 10    Health Maintenance Organization's administrative and 11    marketing expenses, but shall not include any refund to be 12    made or additional premium to be paid pursuant to this 13    subsection (f)). The Health Maintenance Organization and 14    the group or enrollment unit may agree that the profitable 15    or unprofitable experience may be calculated taking into 16    account the refund period and the immediately preceding 2 17    plan years.18    The Health Maintenance Organization shall include a 19statement in the evidence of coverage issued to each enrollee 20describing the possibility of a refund or additional premium, 21and upon request of any group or enrollment unit, provide to 22the group or enrollment unit a description of the method used 23to calculate (1) the Health Maintenance Organization's 24profitable experience with respect to the group or enrollment 25unit and the resulting refund to the group or enrollment unit 26or (2) the Health Maintenance Organization's unprofitable   HB1360 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 07412 BAB 17453 b1experience with respect to the group or enrollment unit and 2the resulting additional premium to be paid by the group or 3enrollment unit.4    In no event shall the Illinois Health Maintenance 5Organization Guaranty Association be liable to pay any 6contractual obligation of an insolvent organization to pay any 7refund authorized under this Section.8    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, 9if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 10accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative 11Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint 12Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 13adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized. 14(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-34, eff. 6-25-21; 15102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 161-1-22; 102-589, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, 17eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 18102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 191-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, 20eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 21103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 226-30-23; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 23eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 24103-618, eff. 1-1-25; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 251-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 26eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25;   HB1360 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 07412 BAB 17453 b1103-777, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 21-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 9-26-24.) 3    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-808)4    Sec. 5-3. Insurance Code provisions. 5    (a) Health Maintenance Organizations shall be subject to 6the provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 7141.1, 141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 8152, 153, 154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.22a, 9155.49, 352c, 355.2, 355.3, 355.6, 355b, 355c, 356f, 356g, 10356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356z.2, 11356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 12356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.17, 13356z.18, 356z.19, 356z.20, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.23, 356z.24, 14356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.28, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.31, 356z.32, 15356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.36, 356z.37, 356z.38, 356z.39, 16356z.40, 356z.40a, 356z.41, 356z.44, 356z.45, 356z.46, 17356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.49, 356z.50, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 18356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.58, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 19356z.62, 356z.63, 356z.64, 356z.65, 356z.66, 356z.67, 356z.68, 20356z.69, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 21356z.77, 356z.80, 364, 364.01, 364.3, 367.2, 367.2-5, 367i, 22368a, 368b, 368c, 368d, 368e, 370c, 370c.1, 401, 401.1, 402, 23403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1, paragraph (c) 24of subsection (2) of Section 367, and Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, 25XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and XXXIIB of the   HB1360 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 07412 BAB 17453 b1Illinois Insurance Code.2    (b) For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except 3for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 4Health Maintenance Organizations in the following categories 5are deemed to be "domestic companies":6        (1) a corporation authorized under the Dental Service 7    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act;8        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of this 9    State; or10        (3) a corporation organized under the laws of another 11    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 12    of this State, except a corporation subject to 13    substantially the same requirements in its state of 14    organization as is a "domestic company" under Article VIII 15    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.16    (c) In considering the merger, consolidation, or other 17acquisition of control of a Health Maintenance Organization 18pursuant to Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,19        (1) the Director shall give primary consideration to 20    the continuation of benefits to enrollees and the 21    financial conditions of the acquired Health Maintenance 22    Organization after the merger, consolidation, or other 23    acquisition of control takes effect;24        (2)(i) the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b) of 25    Section 131.8 of the Illinois Insurance Code shall not 26    apply and (ii) the Director, in making his determination   HB1360 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 07412 BAB 17453 b1    with respect to the merger, consolidation, or other 2    acquisition of control, need not take into account the 3    effect on competition of the merger, consolidation, or 4    other acquisition of control;5        (3) the Director shall have the power to require the 6    following information:7            (A) certification by an independent actuary of the 8        adequacy of the reserves of the Health Maintenance 9        Organization sought to be acquired;10            (B) pro forma financial statements reflecting the 11        combined balance sheets of the acquiring company and 12        the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 13        acquired as of the end of the preceding year and as of 14        a date 90 days prior to the acquisition, as well as pro 15        forma financial statements reflecting projected 16        combined operation for a period of 2 years;17            (C) a pro forma business plan detailing an 18        acquiring party's plans with respect to the operation 19        of the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 20        acquired for a period of not less than 3 years; and21            (D) such other information as the Director shall 22        require.23    (d) The provisions of Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois 24Insurance Code and this Section 5-3 shall apply to the sale by 25any health maintenance organization of greater than 10% of its 26enrollee population (including, without limitation, the health   HB1360 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 07412 BAB 17453 b1maintenance organization's right, title, and interest in and 2to its health care certificates).3    (e) In considering any management contract or service 4agreement subject to Section 141.1 of the Illinois Insurance 5Code, the Director (i) shall, in addition to the criteria 6specified in Section 141.2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, 7take into account the effect of the management contract or 8service agreement on the continuation of benefits to enrollees 9and the financial condition of the health maintenance 10organization to be managed or serviced, and (ii) need not take 11into account the effect of the management contract or service 12agreement on competition.13    (f) Except for small employer groups as defined in the 14Small Employer Rating, Renewability and Portability Health 15Insurance Act and except for medicare supplement policies as 16defined in Section 363 of the Illinois Insurance Code, a 17Health Maintenance Organization may by contract agree with a 18group or other enrollment unit to effect refunds or charge 19additional premiums under the following terms and conditions:20        (i) the amount of, and other terms and conditions with 21    respect to, the refund or additional premium are set forth 22    in the group or enrollment unit contract agreed in advance 23    of the period for which a refund is to be paid or 24    additional premium is to be charged (which period shall 25    not be less than one year); and26        (ii) the amount of the refund or additional premium   HB1360 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 07412 BAB 17453 b1    shall not exceed 20% of the Health Maintenance 2    Organization's profitable or unprofitable experience with 3    respect to the group or other enrollment unit for the 4    period (and, for purposes of a refund or additional 5    premium, the profitable or unprofitable experience shall 6    be calculated taking into account a pro rata share of the 7    Health Maintenance Organization's administrative and 8    marketing expenses, but shall not include any refund to be 9    made or additional premium to be paid pursuant to this 10    subsection (f)). The Health Maintenance Organization and 11    the group or enrollment unit may agree that the profitable 12    or unprofitable experience may be calculated taking into 13    account the refund period and the immediately preceding 2 14    plan years.15    The Health Maintenance Organization shall include a 16statement in the evidence of coverage issued to each enrollee 17describing the possibility of a refund or additional premium, 18and upon request of any group or enrollment unit, provide to 19the group or enrollment unit a description of the method used 20to calculate (1) the Health Maintenance Organization's 21profitable experience with respect to the group or enrollment 22unit and the resulting refund to the group or enrollment unit 23or (2) the Health Maintenance Organization's unprofitable 24experience with respect to the group or enrollment unit and 25the resulting additional premium to be paid by the group or 26enrollment unit.  HB1360 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 07412 BAB 17453 b1    In no event shall the Illinois Health Maintenance 2Organization Guaranty Association be liable to pay any 3contractual obligation of an insolvent organization to pay any 4refund authorized under this Section.5    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, 6if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 7accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative 8Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint 9Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 10adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized. 11(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-34, eff. 6-25-21; 12102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 131-1-22; 102-589, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, 14eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 15102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 161-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, 17eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 18103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 196-30-23; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 20eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 21103-618, eff. 1-1-25; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 221-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 23eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 24103-777, eff. 8-2-24; 103-808, eff. 1-1-26; 103-914, eff. 251-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 2611-26-24.)   HB1360 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 07412 BAB 17453 b1    Section 35. The Limited Health Service Organization Act is 2amended by changing Section 4003 as follows: 3    (215 ILCS 130/4003)  (from Ch. 73, par. 1504-3)4    Sec. 4003. Illinois Insurance Code provisions. Limited 5health service organizations shall be subject to the 6provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 141.1, 7141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 152, 153, 8154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.37, 155.49, 352c, 9355.2, 355.3, 355b, 355d, 356m, 356q, 356v, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 10356z.10, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.32, 11356z.33, 356z.41, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 12356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.61, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.71, 13356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.80, 364.3, 368a, 401, 401.1, 14402, 403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1 and 15Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, and 16XXVI of the Illinois Insurance Code. Nothing in this Section 17shall require a limited health care plan to cover any service 18that is not a limited health service. For purposes of the 19Illinois Insurance Code, except for Sections 444 and 444.1 and 20Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, limited health service 21organizations in the following categories are deemed to be 22domestic companies:23        (1) a corporation under the laws of this State; or24        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of another   HB1360 Engrossed- 23 -LRB104 07412 BAB 17453 b1    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 2    of this State, except a corporation subject to 3    substantially the same requirements in its state of 4    organization as is a domestic company under Article VIII 5    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.6(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 7102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-731, eff. 81-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, 9eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 1-1-23; 10102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 111-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 12eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 13103-656, eff. 1-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 147-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, 15eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 16    Section 40. The Voluntary Health Services Plans Act is 17amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 18    (215 ILCS 165/10)  (from Ch. 32, par. 604)19    Sec. 10. Application of Insurance Code provisions. Health 20services plan corporations and all persons interested therein 21or dealing therewith shall be subject to the provisions of 22Articles IIA and XII 1/2 and Sections 3.1, 133, 136, 139, 140, 23143, 143.31, 143c, 149, 155.22a, 155.37, 354, 355.2, 355.3, 24355b, 355d, 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356r, 356t,   HB1360 Engrossed- 24 -LRB104 07412 BAB 17453 b1356u, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356y, 356z.1, 356z.2, 2356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 3356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.18, 4356z.19, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 5356z.32, 356z.32a, 356z.33, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.46, 6356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 7356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.71, 8356z.72, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.77, 356z.80, 364.01, 364.3, 9367.2, 368a, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 408, 408.2, and 412, 10and paragraphs (7) and (15) of Section 367 of the Illinois 11Insurance Code.12    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 13any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 14with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 15Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 16Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 17whatever reason, is unauthorized. 18(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 19102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 2010-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 102-804, 21eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 22102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, eff. 231-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 24eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 25103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-656, eff. 261-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-753,   HB1360 Engrossed- 25 -LRB104 07412 BAB 17453 b1eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, eff. 1-1-25; 2103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 31-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 4    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 5changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 6that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 7represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 8not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 9made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 10Public Act. 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law, except that the changes to Section 6.11 of the 13State Employees Group Insurance Act of 1971 take effect on 14July 1, 2027.